Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 65. Service Programs for Older Alaskans and Other Adults.

Administrative Code. —

For older Alaskans’ pilot project grants, see 7 AAC 79.

Legislative history reports. —

For conflicting views on the status of HB 611 amS, which became ch. 162, SLA 1980, which enacted this chapter, see memorandum of legislative counsel at page 1723, 1980 Senate Journal and the opinion of the Attorney General at 1980 Senate Journal page 1764 and 1980 House Journal page 2221.